Utah statutes.
72-7-208.   Junkyard operated in violation of provisions is public nuisance
-- Abatement -- Adjudicative proceedings -- Judicial review -- Costs of
abatement.
(1)  The establishment, operation, or maintenance of any junkyard contrary to
the provisions of this part is a public nuisance.
(2)  The department shall:
(a)  enforce the provisions of this part and administrative rules the
department makes under this part; and
(b)  except as provided in Subsection (3) and in its enforcement of the
provisions of this part, comply with the procedures and requirements of Title
63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.
(3) (a)  The district court has jurisdiction to review by trial de novo all
final orders of the department under this part resulting from formal and
informal adjudicative proceedings.
(b)  Venue for judicial review of final orders of the department is in the
county in which the junkyard is located.
(4)  If the department is granted a judgment, the department is entitled to
take action necessary to cause the nuisance to be abated and is entitled to
recover from the responsible person, firm, or corporation, jointly and
severally:
(a)  the costs and expenses incurred in abating the nuisance; and
(b)  $10 for each day the junkyard was maintained following the expiration of
10 days after notice of agency action was filed and served under Section
63G-4-201.
